Hawaii, session 2026, HB2159.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the university of Hawaii is responsible for training the next generation of doctors, nurses, dentists, pharmacists, and public health workers in the State.  The legislature further finds that severe shortages in nearly all health profession disciplines and most medical specialties have severely limited access to care, particularly in rural and underserved areas and areas with certain minority and vulnerable positions.  These workforce shortages are particularly felt in high-priority areas of concern such as cancer, neurology and dementia, and behavioral health-primary care integration and addiction medicine. The legislature also finds that establishing additional clinical faculty positions in the university of Hawaii at Manoa John A. Burns school of medicine, university of Hawaii cancer center, university of Hawaii at Manoa school of nursing and dental hygiene, university of Hawaii at Manoa Thompson school of social work and public health, and university of Hawaii Hilo Daniel K. Inouye college of pharmacy will strengthen the ability of the university of Hawaii to address critical workforce shortages by filling key educational, training, and clinical-translational research roles. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to establish and appropriate funds for additional positions in the university of Hawaii to address the State's health care workforce shortages. SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $3,724,600 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the establishment of eighteen and a half full-time equivalent (18.5 FTE) positions within the university of Hawaii system to support health care workforce development in Hawaii. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the university of Hawaii for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________